Tennessee, session 114, HB2185.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-2-401, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection (c) and redesignating the existing subsection (c) and any
subsequent subsection accordingly:
(c) The portal may also access data from the systematic alien verification for
entitlements (SAVE) program from the United States department of homeland security,
United States citizenship and immigration services (DHS-USCIS), if DHS-USCIS makes
such data available via a secure web service.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2185
012642
- 1 -